North Carolina, session 2025, HB796.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) To Print Safety Numbers on Student Identification Cards (Student IDs). – A
local board of education shall ensure that any new student ID issued to a
student in grade six through 12 shall have printed in a conspicuous location
on the ID the following text and phone numbers:
a. Call or text the Lifeline at 988, available 24 hours a day.
b. The Crisis Text line can be accessed by texting HOME to 741741.
c. The telephone number for the NC Statewide Warmline is
1-855-733-7762.
The local board of education shall verify that the numbers being printed on
student IDs are accurate and current on an annual basis and shall use updated
contact information for the resources listed in this section if found. Nothing in
this subdivision shall be construed to require the issuance of student IDs."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(37) To print safety numbers on student identification cards (student IDs). – The
board of trustees shall ensure that any new student ID issued to a student in
grade six through 12 shall have printed in a conspicuous location on the ID
the following text and phone numbers:
a. Call or text the Lifeline at 988, available 24 hours a day.
b. The Crisis Text line can be accessed by texting HOME to 741741.
c. The telephone number for the NC Statewide Warmline is
1-855-733-7762.
The board shall verify that the numbers being printed on student IDs are
accurate and current on an annual basis and shall use updated contact
information for the resources listed in this section if found. Nothing in this
subdivision shall be construed to require the issuance of student IDs."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
*H796-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(p) To Print Safety Numbers on Student Identification Cards (Student IDs). – A charter
school shall ensure that any new student ID issued to a student in grade six through 12 shall have
printed in a conspicuous location on the ID the following text and phone numbers:
(1) Call or text the Lifeline at 988, available 24 hours a day.
(2) The Crisis Text line can be accessed by texting HOME to 741741.
(3) The telephone number for the NC Statewide Warmline is 1-855-733-7762.
The school shall verify that the numbers being printed on student IDs are accurate and current
on an annual basis and shall use updated contact information for the resources listed in this
section if found. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require the issuance of student
IDs."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) To print safety numbers on student identification cards (student IDs). – A
regional school shall ensure that any new student ID issued to a student in
grade six through 12 shall have printed in a conspicuous location on the ID
the following text and phone numbers:
a. Call or text the Lifeline at 988, available 24 hours a day.
b. The Crisis Text line can be accessed by texting HOME to 741741.
c. The telephone number for the NC Statewide Warmline is
1-855-733-7762.
The school shall verify that the numbers being printed on student IDs are
accurate and current on an annual basis and shall use updated contact
information for the resources listed in this section if found. Nothing in this
subdivision shall be construed to require the issuance of student IDs."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(26) To print safety numbers on student identification cards (student IDs). – A
laboratory school shall ensure that any new student ID issued to a student in
grade six through 12 shall have printed in a conspicuous location on the ID
the following text and phone numbers:
a. Call or text the Lifeline at 988, available 24 hours a day.
b. The Crisis Text line can be accessed by texting HOME to 741741.
c. The telephone number for the NC Statewide Warmline is
1-855-733-7762.
The school shall verify that the numbers being printed on student IDs are
accurate and current on an annual basis and shall use updated contact
information for the resources listed in this section if found. Nothing in this
subdivision shall be construed to require the issuance of student IDs."
SECTION 1.(f) Part 4 of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-566.5. To provide safety numbers on student identification cards.
To Print Safety Numbers on Student Identification Cards (Student IDs). – Nonpublic schools
operating pursuant to Part 1 or Part 2 of this Article are encouraged to include on any student ID
issued to a student in grade six through 12 in a conspicuous location on the ID the following text
and phone numbers:
(1) Call or text the Lifeline at 988, available 24 hours a day.
(2) The Crisis Text line can be accessed by texting HOME to 741741.
(3) The telephone number for the NC Statewide Warmline is 1-855-733-7762.
The school is encouraged to verify that the numbers being printed on student IDs are accurate
and current on an annual basis and use updated contact information for the resources listed in this
section if found. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the issuance of student IDs."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 796-First Edition